Utah statutes.
62A-7-106.5.   Annual review of programs and facilities.

(1) (a) The division shall annually review all programs and facilities that provide services to juveniles who have committed a delinquent act, in this state or in any other state, which would constitute a felony or misdemeanor if committed by an adult, and license those programs and facilities that are in compliance with standards approved by the board.  The division shall provide written reviews to the managers of those programs and facilities.

(b)  Based upon policies established by the board, programs or facilities that are unable or unwilling to comply with the approved standards may not be licensed.

(2)  Any private facility or program providing services under this chapter that willfully fails to comply with the standards established by the division is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

